Utah statutes.
72-10-126.   Marking buildings to aid navigation.

(1)  The division may cooperate with the officials of all state institutions for the purpose of marking one building within their group as an aid to aerial navigation.

(2)  The marking is subject to the approval of the division and shall comply with the requirements of the United States civil aeronautics authority for air marking.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

